New York, session 2025-2026, A5312.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The opening paragraph and subparagraph 3 of paragraph a of 2 subdivision 4 of section 2590-b of the education law, as amended by 3 chapter 345 of the laws of 2009, are amended to read as follows: 4 There shall be a city-wide council on special education created pursu- 5 ant to this section. The city-wide council on special education shall 6 consist of [eleven] thirteen voting members [and one non-voting member], 7 as follows: 8 (3) [one non-voting member] two voting members who [is a] are high 9 school [senior] students with an individualized education program, 10 appointed by the administrator designated by the chancellor to supervise 11 special education programs. Such member shall serve a one year term. 12 § 2. The opening paragraph and subparagraph (iii) of paragraph (a) of 13 subdivision 5 of section 2590-b of the education law, as added by chap- 14 ter 345 of the laws of 2009, are amended to read as follows: 15 There shall be a city-wide council on English language learners 16 created pursuant to this section. The city-wide council on English 17 language learners shall consist of [eleven] thirteen voting members [and 18 one non-voting member], as follows: 19 (iii) [one non-voting member] two voting members who [is a] are high 20 school [senior] students who [is] are or [has] have been in a bilin- 21 gual or English as a second language program, appointed by the adminis- 22 trator designated by the chancellor to supervise such programs. Such 23 member shall serve a one year term. 24 § 3. The opening paragraph and subparagraph (v) of paragraph (a) of 25 subdivision 6 of section 2590-b of the education law, as added by chap- 26 ter 345 of the laws of 2009, are amended to read as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09394-01-5 A. 5312 2 1 There shall be a city-wide council on high schools created pursuant to 2 this section. The city-wide council on high schools shall consist of 3 [thirteen] fifteen voting members [and one non-voting member], as 4 follows: 5 (v) [one non-voting member] two voting members who [is a] are public 6 high school [senior] students, appointed by the chancellor pursuant to 7 a process developed by the chancellor. Such member shall serve a one 8 year term. 9 § 4. The opening paragraph and subparagraph (iii) of paragraph (a) of 10 subdivision 7 of section 2590-b of the education law, as added by chap- 11 ter 364 of the laws of 2022, are amended to read as follows: 12 There shall be a city-wide council on district seventy-five created 13 pursuant to this section. The city-wide council for district seventy- 14 five shall consist of [eleven] thirteen voting members [and one non-vot- 15 ing member], as follows: 16 (iii) [one non-voting member] two voting members who [is a] are high 17 school [senior] students appointed by the administrator designated by 18 the chancellor to supervise district seventy-five schools and programs. 19 Such member shall serve a one year term. 20 § 5. The opening paragraph and paragraph (d) of subdivision 1 of 21 section 2590-c of the education law, as amended by chapter 364 of the 22 laws of 2022, are amended to read as follows: 23 Each community district shall be governed by a community district 24 education council. The community councils shall consist of [twelve] 25 fifteen voting members [and two non-voting members], as follows: 26 (d) [Two non-voting] three voting members who are high school [seniors 27 residing] students attending a high school in the district, shall be 28 appointed by the superintendent from among the [elected] student [lead- 29 ership] body. Such members shall serve for a one year term. 30 § 6. The opening paragraph of subdivision 1 of section 2590-c of the 31 education law, as amended by chapter 385 of the laws of 1998, is amended 32 to read as follows: 33 Each community district shall be governed by a community board to 34 consist of nine members to be elected for a term of three years, and two 35 members who shall be students chosen by the board, and to serve without 36 compensation. Each such board shall select one of its members to serve 37 as [chairman] chairperson. 38 § 7. Subdivisions 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11 and 12 of section 2590-c of 39 the education law are renumbered subdivisions 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12 and 40 13 and a new subdivision 5 is added to read as follows: 41 5. Every student attending any high school under the jurisdiction of 42 the community board of such district shall be eligible for membership as 43 a student on such community board. The community board shall fill both 44 student positions within forty-five days of the community board's 45 election. 46 § 8. This act shall take effect immediately; provided that: 47 (a) the amendments to section 2590-b of the education law made by 48 sections one, two, three and four of this act shall not affect the expi- 49 ration of such section and shall expire and be deemed repealed there- 50 with; and 51 (b) the amendments to section 2590-c of the education law made by 52 section five of this act shall be subject to the expiration and rever- 53 sion of such section when upon such date the provisions of section six 54 and seven of this act shall take effect.